District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.01

Requirement to disclose prescription drug marketing costs.

A manufacturer or labeler of prescription drugs dispensed in the District that employs, directs, or utilizes marketing representatives in the District shall report marketing costs for prescription drugs in the District. These marketing costs shall be reported to the Department for the purposes of assisting the District in its role as a purchaser of prescription drugs and as an administrator of prescription drug programs, enabling the District to determine the scope of prescription drug marketing costs and their effect on the cost, utilization, and delivery of health care services, and furthering the role of the District as guardian of the public interest.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 301, 51 DCR 3688